California, session 20252026, AB500.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 92032.8 is added to the Education Code, to read:92032.8. (a) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “A change to the conditions for undergraduate admissions” means any of the following:(A) A change to the policy for undergraduate admissions to the University of California adopted by the regents.(B) A reclassification or modification of which types of high school courses meet the A–G subject matter requirements for admission to the University of California.(C) A change to the admissions requirement criteria used in the review and certification of high school courses as meeting the A–G subject matter requirements for admission to the University of California.(2) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.(3) “Regent” means a board member of the Regents of the University of California.(4) “Regents” means the Regents of the University of California.(5) “State board” means the State Board of Education.(6) “Trustees” means the Trustees of the California State University.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that a University of California proposal Before a proposal regarding a change to the conditions for undergraduate admissions becomes operative only after all of the following has occurred: is adopted by the regents, the University of California is requested to complete all of the following:(1) The proposal has been provided Provide the proposal to the official student organization representing the student body of the University of California, the state board, and the trustees for consideration.(2)The proposal has been identified as an item for discussion and discussed by the state board and the trustees at a meeting of each of these boards, respectively.(3)(2) (A) Notice Provide notice of the meeting of the regents at which the proposal is to be considered has been provided to each regent.(B) Information Provide information and materials regarding the proposal, including a full disclosure of the impact on local educational agencies, the University of California, and the California State University, have been made available to each regent in advance of the meeting described in subparagraph (A).(C) The intention Provide a meeting notice regarding the intent of the regents to vote on the proposal has been included in the meeting notice made available to the public pursuant to the requirements of Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(D) The proposal has been made available, Ensure that the proposal has been made available to members of the public present at the open session at which adoption of the proposal is to be considered before the commencement of an the open session of the regents at which adoption of the proposal is to be considered, to members of the public present at the open session. session.(E)The proposal is acted upon by the regents as the final open session action item.(4)The proposal has been adopted(3) Adopt the proposal by majority vote of the regents through the making of a motion. This paragraph does not prohibit full discussion, in open session, of the contents of the motion or the reasons why the proposal should or should not be adopted.(c) Upon being provided a proposal by the University of California, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), the state board and the trustees shall identify as an item for discussion and discuss the proposal at an open meeting of each of these boards, respectively.